District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.57

Residency preference.

The provisions of § 1-608.01(e)(1), (2), (3), (5), (6), and (7) shall apply to employment in the Management Supervisory Service.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 957
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-610.57.
Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-609.51.